zh-CN: 转印纸技术: 喷墨; 熨烫; 激光; 升华; 其他
tr: Transfer kağıdı tekniği: Mürekkep püskürtme; Ütüyle yapıştırma; Lazer; Süblimasyon; Diğer
ko: 전사지 기술: 잉크젯; 다림질 부착; 레이저; 승화; 기타
ja: 転写紙法: インクジェット; アイロン接着; レーザー; 昇華; その他
bg-BG: Техника на трансферна хартия: Мастиленоструен; Iron-on; Лазерен; Сублимация; Други
sl-SI: Tehnika papirja za prenos: Brizgalni; Likanje; Laser; Sublimacija; Drugo
es: Técnica del papel de transferencia: Inyección de tinta; Planchado; Láser; Sublimación; Otros
pt-BR: Técnica de papel de transferência: Jato de tinta; A ferro; Laser; Sublimação; Outro
th: เทคนิคการใช้กระดาษลอกลาย: การพิมพ์แบบอิงค์เจ็ท; กระบวนการถ่ายโอนความร้อน; เลเซอร์; การพิมพ์แบบระเหิด; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 轉印紙技術: 噴墨式; 熨燙; 雷射; 昇華; 其他
hr-HR: Tehnika prijenosnog papira: Inkjet; Peglanje; Laser; Sublimacija; Ostalo
nl: Techniek transferpapier: Inkjet; Opstrijkbaar; Laser; Sublimatie; Andere
pl: Technika stosowania papieru transferowego: Atramentowy; Naklejanie na gorąco; Laser; Sublimacja; Inne
cs: Technika přenosového papíru: Inkoustový; Nažehlovací; Laser; Sublimační; Jiné
fi: Siirtopaperitekniikka: Mustesuihku; Silitettävä; Laser; Sublimaatio; Muu
sk-SK: Technika prenosového papiera: Atramentový; Nažehľovací; Laserový; Sublimácia; Iné
ru: Техника использования термобумаги: Струйная; Термоперенос; Лазерная; Сублимация; Другой
it: Tecnica della carta transfer: Getto di inchiostro; Stirabile; Laser; Sublimazione; Altro
nb: Overføringspapirteknikk: Inkjet; Iron-on; Laser; Sublimering; Annet
el: Τεχνική χαρτιού μεταφοράς: Ψεκασμού μελάνης (Inkjet); σίδερο; Λέιζερ; Εξάχνιση; Άλλο
vi: Kỹ thuật giấy in chuyển nhiệt: In phun; Dán bằng cách là; Laser; Thăng hoa; Khác
ro-RO: Tehnica hârtiei de transfer: Jet de cerneală; Călcare cu fierul; Laser; Sublimare; Altele
lt-LT: Spaudos popieriaus technika: Rašalinis; Lyginamas; Lazerinis; Sublimacinis; Kita
hu: Transzferpapír-technika: Tintasugaras; Vasalható; Lézer; Szublimáció; Egyéb
fr: Technique du papier transfert: Jet d’encre; Thermocollant; Laser; Sublimation; Autre
en: Transfer paper technique: Inkjet; Iron-on; Laser; Sublimation; Other
sv: Teknik för pappersöverföring: Inkjet; Strykning; Laser; Sublimering; Övrigt
pt-PT: Técnica de transferência de papel: Jato de tinta; Ferro; Laser; Sublimação; Outro
da: Teknik til overførselspapir: Inkjet; Stryg-på; Laser; Farvesublimering; Andet
de: Transferpapiertechnik: Inkjet; Aufbügelbar; Laser; Sublimation; Sonstiges